Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB913.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 9720.9. Sentencing for offenses committed while engaged in riots.The Pennsylvania Commission on Sentencing, in accordance with section 2154 (relating to adoption of guidelines for sentencing), shall provide for a sentence enhancement within its guidelines for an offense under 18 Pa.C.S. § 2701 (relating to simple assault), 2702 (relating to aggravated assault), 2705 (relating to recklessly endangering another person), 2706 (relating to terroristic threats), 2709 (relating to harassment), 3502 (relating to burglary) or 3503 (relating to criminal trespass), specifying variations from the range of 123456789101112131415161718 sentences applicable based on such aggravating circumstances as the offense was committed while engaging in a violation of 18 Pa.C.S. § 5501 (relating to riot).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0913PN1089 - 2 - 1234